New York, session 2025-2026, A10976.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 354-a to read as follows: 3 § 354-a. Public notice and hearing required for fees and surcharges. 4 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall have the follow- 5 ing meanings: 6 (a) "Fee" or "surcharge" means any administrative fee, service fee, 7 percentage-based fee, assessment, or other charge imposed in connection 8 with the collection of tolls, participation in a toll program, or the 9 administration of toll accounts, including but not limited to fees 10 imposed on third-party toll service providers or categories of toll 11 customers; 12 (b) For the avoidance of doubt, the term "toll," as used in this title 13 and any other provision of law, shall be deemed to include any fee, 14 surcharge, assessment, or other charge imposed in connection with the 15 use of the thruway, participation in a toll program, or the adminis- 16 tration of toll accounts; and 17 (c) "Material change" means the establishment of a new fee or 18 surcharge, an increase to an existing fee or surcharge, or the creation 19 of a new class or category of account holders subject to a fee or 20 surcharge. 21 2. The authority shall not adopt or implement any fee, surcharge, or 22 material change constituting, deemed, or treated as a toll or toll 23 adjustment under law unless such fee or surcharge is established in 24 accordance with the same public notice, publication, hearing, and 25 approval procedures required for a toll rate adjustment pursuant to this 26 title or any other applicable provision of law. 27 3. Such procedures shall include, but not be limited to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14963-01-6 A. 10976 2 1 (a) public posting of the proposed fee or surcharge, including the 2 amount, methodology, and effective date; 3 (b) written notice to affected account holders and stakeholders; 4 (c) a public comment period of not less than thirty days; and 5 (d) at least one public hearing, which may be conducted in person or 6 virtually, with a public record maintained by the authority. 7 4. Prior to adoption of any fee or surcharge, the authority shall 8 prepare and make publicly available a written justification describing 9 the costs the fee or surcharge is intended to recover and the rationale 10 for the amount imposed. 11 5. Any fee or surcharge in effect on or after the effective date of 12 this section and adopted in violation of this section shall be void and 13 unenforceable until the requirements of this section have been satis- 14 fied. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 16 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 17 sary for the implementation of this act are authorized to be made and 18 completed on or before such effective date.